Mississippi statutes. Title 67. Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 1. Local Option Alcoholic Beverage Control
§ 67-1-14.
Local option election to render chapter ineffective in certain municipalities.

[Effective until the date Laws of 2012, ch. 462 is effectuated under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended and extended, this section will read: ]

The legalizing provisions of this chapter may be effective, applicable and operative in any municipality located in a county which has voted against coming out from under the dry law if a local option election shall be called and held in such municipality in the manner and with the results hereinafter provided.

Any municipality in this state having a population of not less than six thousand (6,000) according to the latest federal census, all or any portion of which is located within five (5) miles of the Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway and which is located in a county which has voted against coming out from under the dry law, may, at an election held for the purpose under the election laws applicable to such municipality, either prohibit or permit, except as otherwise provided under Section 67-9-1, the sale, and the receipt, storage and transportation for the purpose of sale, of alcoholic beverages. An election to determine whether such sale and possession shall be permitted in municipalities wherein its sale and possession is prohibited by law shall be ordered by the municipal governing authorities upon the presentation of a petition to such governing authorities containing the names of at least twenty percent (20%) of the duly qualified voters of such municipality asking for such election. In like manner, an election to determine whether such sale and possession shall be prohibited in municipalities wherein its sale is permitted by law shall be ordered by the municipal governing authorities upon the presentation of a petition to such governing authorities containing the names of at least twenty percent (20%) of the duly qualified voters of such municipality asking for such election. No election on either question shall be held by any one (1) municipality more often than once in two (2) years.

Thirty (30) days’ notice shall be given to the qualified electors of such municipality, in the manner prescribed by law, upon the question of either permitting or prohibiting such sale and possession, such notice to contain a statement of the question to be voted on at the election. The ballots to be used in the election shall have the following words printed thereon: “For the legal sale of alcoholic liquors,” and the words “Against the legal sale of alcoholic liquors” next below. In marking his ballot the voter shall make a cross (X) opposite the words of his choice.

If in the election a majority of the qualified electors voting in the election shall vote “for the legal sale of alcoholic liquors,” then the municipal governing authorities shall pass the necessary order permitting the legal sale of such alcoholic beverages in such municipality. If in the election a majority of the qualified electors voting in the election shall vote “against the legal sale of alcoholic liquors,” then the municipal governing authorities shall pass the necessary order prohibiting the sale of alcoholic beverages in such municipality.

The provisions of this subsection shall also apply to any municipality having a population of not less than six thousand (6,000) according to the latest federal census, a portion of which is located in a county which has voted against coming out from under the dry law and a portion of which is located in a county which has voted in favor of coming out from under the dry law. For the purpose of determining whether or not such a municipality meets the threshold population of six thousand (6,000) which will qualify the municipality to hold an election under this subsection, the entire population of the municipality shall be considered; however, the petition to hold the election authorized in this subsection shall be ordered by the municipal governing authorities upon the presentation of a petition to such governing authorities containing the names of at least twenty percent (20%) of the duly qualified voters of such municipality who reside in that portion of the municipality located in a county which has voted against coming out from under the dry law and the election shall be held only in that portion of the municipality. In all other respects, the authority for the holding of elections and the manner in which such elections shall be conducted shall be as prescribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection; and, after proper certification of election results, the municipal governing authorities shall pass the appropriate order to permit or prohibit the legal sale of alcoholic beverages in that portion of the municipality located in a county which has voted against coming out from under the dry law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 569, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 445, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 417, § 8; Laws, 2012, ch. 462, § 1, eff (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section.).

§ 67-1-14.
Local option election to render chapter ineffective in certain municipalities.

[Effective from and after the date Laws of 2012, ch. 462 is effectuated under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended and extended, this section will read:]

The legalizing provisions of this chapter may be effective, applicable and operative in any municipality located in a county which has voted against coming out from under the dry law if a local option election shall be called and held in such municipality in the manner and with the results hereinafter provided.

Any municipality in this state having a population of not less than five thousand (5,000) according to the latest federal census and which is located in a county which has voted against coming out from under the dry law, or any municipality that is a county seat and which is located in a county which has voted against coming out from under the dry law, may, at an election held for the purpose under the election laws applicable to such municipality, either prohibit or permit, except as otherwise provided under Section 67-9-1, the sale, and the receipt, storage and transportation for the purpose of sale, of alcoholic beverages. An election to determine whether such sale and possession shall be permitted in municipalities wherein its sale and possession is prohibited by law shall be ordered by the municipal governing authorities upon the presentation of a petition to such governing authorities containing the names of at least twenty percent (20%) of the duly qualified voters of such municipality asking for such election. In like manner, an election to determine whether such sale and possession shall be prohibited in municipalities wherein its sale is permitted by law shall be ordered by the municipal governing authorities upon the presentation of a petition to such governing authorities containing the names of at least twenty percent (20%) of the duly qualified voters of such municipality asking for such election. No election on either question shall be held by any one (1) municipality more often than once in two (2) years.

Thirty (30) days’ notice shall be given to the qualified electors of such municipality, in the manner prescribed by law, upon the question of either permitting or prohibiting such sale and possession, such notice to contain a statement of the question to be voted on at the election. The ballots to be used in the election shall have the following words printed thereon: “For the legal sale of alcoholic liquors” and the words “Against the legal sale of alcoholic liquors” next below. In marking his ballot the voter shall make a cross (X) opposite the words of his choice.

If in the election a majority of the qualified electors voting in the election shall vote “for the legal sale of alcoholic liquors,” then the municipal governing authorities shall pass the necessary order permitting the legal sale of such alcoholic beverages in such municipality. If in the election a majority of the qualified electors voting in the election shall vote “against the legal sale of alcoholic liquors,” then the municipal governing authorities shall pass the necessary order prohibiting the sale of alcoholic beverages in such municipality.

The provisions of this subsection shall also apply to any municipality having a population of not less than six thousand (6,000) according to the latest federal census, a portion of which is located in a county which has voted against coming out from under the dry law and a portion of which is located in a county which has voted in favor of coming out from under the dry law. For the purpose of determining whether or not such a municipality meets the threshold population of six thousand (6,000) which will qualify the municipality to hold an election under this subsection, the entire population of the municipality shall be considered; however, the petition to hold the election authorized in this subsection shall be ordered by the municipal governing authorities upon the presentation of a petition to such governing authorities containing the names of at least twenty percent (20%) of the duly qualified voters of such municipality who reside in that portion of the municipality located in a county which has voted against coming out from under the dry law and the election shall be held only in that portion of the municipality. In all other respects, the authority for the holding of elections and the manner in which such elections shall be conducted shall be as prescribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection; and, after proper certification of election results, the municipal governing authorities shall pass the appropriate order to permit or prohibit the legal sale of alcoholic beverages in that portion of the municipality located in a county which has voted against coming out from under the dry law.

The governing authorities of a municipality that has voted to come out from under the dry laws after the effective date of this act may, by ordinance, provide that alcoholic beverages may be sold in the municipality only by the holder of an on-premises retailer’s permit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 569, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 445, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 417, § 8; Laws, 2012, ch. 462, § 1, eff (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section.).

§ 67-1-15.
Local option elections in counties having two judicial districts.

In any county having two judicial districts, each such judicial district shall be construed to be a political subdivision or subdivision of government on the same basis as a county, and as such, a judicial district will be entitled to all of the rights, privileges, and immunities as a county for the purposes of authorizing the sale of intoxicating liquor therein under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-35; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 1966.

§ 67-1-16.
Election on question of whether qualified resort to be allowed in municipality; designation of municipality as qualified resort area; county election on question of whether area should be qualified resort area.

Before an area may be designated by the governing authorities of a municipality as an area in which facilities which are defined as qualified resort areas in Section 67-1-5(o)(iii)5 may be located, an election shall be held, under the election laws applicable to the municipality, on the question of whether qualified resort areas shall be allowed in the municipality. An election to determine whether qualified resort areas shall be allowed in the municipality shall be ordered by the municipal governing authorities, upon presentation to the governing authorities of a petition containing the names of at least twenty percent (20%) of the duly qualified voters of the municipality asking for the election. An election on the question may not be held by the municipality more often than once each year.

Thirty (30) days’ notice shall be given to the qualified electors of the municipality, in the manner prescribed by law, on the question of allowing qualified resort areas to be established. The notice shall contain a statement of the question to be voted on at the election. The ballots used in the election shall have the following words printed thereon: “FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF QUALIFIED RESORT AREAS,” and next below, “AGAINST THE ESTABLISHMENT OF QUALIFIED RESORT AREAS.” In marking his ballot, the voter shall make a cross (X) opposite the words of his choice.

Qualified resort areas may be established if a majority of the qualified electors voting in the election vote for such establishment. A qualified resort area may not be established if a majority of the qualified electors voting in the election vote against such establishment.

Before a municipality may be designated as a qualified resort area as defined in Section 67-1-5(o)(iii)6, an election shall be held, under the election laws applicable to the municipality, on the question of whether the municipality shall be a qualified resort area. An election to determine whether the municipality shall be a qualified resort area shall be ordered by the municipal governing authorities, upon presentation to the governing authorities of a petition containing the names of at least twenty percent (20%) of the duly qualified voters of the municipality asking for the election. An election on the question may not be held by the municipality more often than once each year.

Thirty (30) days’ notice shall be given to the qualified electors of the municipality, in the manner prescribed by law, on the question of allowing qualified resort areas to be established. The notice shall contain a statement of the question to be voted on at the election. The ballots used in the election shall have the following words printed thereon: “FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A QUALIFIED RESORT AREA,” and next below, “AGAINST THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A QUALIFIED RESORT AREA.” In marking his ballot, the voter shall make a cross (X) opposite the words of his choice.

The municipality may be established as a qualified resort area if a majority of the qualified electors voting in the election vote for such establishment. A qualified resort area may not be established if a majority of the qualified electors voting in the election vote against such establishment.

Before an area may be designated a qualified resort area as defined in Section 67-1-5(o)(iii)7, an election shall be held in the municipality in which the area is located under the election laws applicable to the municipality, on the question of whether the area shall be a qualified resort area. An election to determine whether the area shall be a qualified resort area shall be ordered by the municipal governing authorities, upon presentation to the governing authorities of a petition containing the names of at least twenty percent (20%) of the duly qualified voters of the municipality asking for the election. An election on the question may not be held by the municipality more often than once each year.

Thirty (30) days’ notice shall be given to the qualified electors of the municipality, in the manner prescribed by law, on the question of allowing qualified resort areas to be established. The notice shall contain a statement of the question to be voted on at the election. The ballots used in the election shall have the following words printed thereon: “FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A QUALIFIED RESORT AREA,” and next below, “AGAINST THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A QUALIFIED RESORT AREA.” In marking his ballot, the voter shall make a cross (X) opposite the words of his choice.

The area may be established as a qualified resort area if a majority of the qualified electors voting in the election vote for such establishment. A qualified resort area may not be established if a majority of the qualified electors voting in the election vote against such establishment.

Before an area may be designated a qualified resort area as defined in Section 67-1-5(o)(iii)8, an election shall be held in the area described in Section 67-1-5(o)(iii)8 under the election laws applicable to counties, on the question of whether the area shall be a qualified resort area. An election to determine whether the area shall be a qualified resort area shall be ordered by the board of supervisors, upon presentation to the board of a petition containing the names of at least twenty percent (20%) of the duly qualified voters of the area described in Section 67-1-5(o)(iii)8 asking for the election. An election on the question may not be held by the county more often than once each year.

Thirty (30) days’ notice shall be given to the qualified electors of the area, in the manner prescribed by law, on the question of allowing qualified resort areas to be established. The notice shall contain a statement of the question to be voted on at the election. The ballots used in the election shall have the following words printed thereon: “FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A QUALIFIED RESORT AREA,” and next below, “AGAINST THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A QUALIFIED RESORT AREA.” In marking his ballot, the voter shall make a cross (X) opposite the words of his choice.

The area may be established as a qualified resort area if a majority of the qualified electors voting in the election vote for such establishment. A qualified resort area may not be established if a majority of the qualified electors voting in the election vote against such establishment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 558, § 2, eff May 26, 2009 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section); Laws, 2014, ch. 346, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 67-1-17.
Unlawful possession of alcoholic beverages; seizure and sale.

It shall be unlawful for any person to have or possess either alcoholic beverages or personal property intended for use in violating the provisions of this chapter, or regulations prescribed under this chapter, or Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972. No property rights shall exist in any such personal property or alcoholic beverages. All such personal property and alcoholic beverages shall be considered contraband and shall be seized and forfeited to the state of Mississippi.

The following are subject to forfeiture:

All alcoholic beverages which have been manufactured, distilled, distributed, dispensed or acquired in violation of this chapter or Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972;

All raw materials, products and equipment of any kind which are used, or intended for use, in manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivering, importing or exporting any alcoholic beverage in violation of this chapter or Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972;

All property which is used, or intended for use, as a container for property described in items (a) or (b) of this subsection;

All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles or vessels, which are used, or intended for use, to transport, or in any manner to facilitate the transportation, for the purpose of sale or receipt, possession or concealment, of property described in item (a) of this subsection which is in excess of six (6) gallons or of property described in item (b) of this subsection; however,

No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a violation of this chapter or Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972;

No conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act or omission proved by the owner thereof to have been committed or omitted without his knowledge or consent; if the confiscating authority has reason to believe that the conveyance is a leased or rented conveyance, then the confiscating authority shall notify the owner of the conveyance within five (5) days of the confiscation; and

A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if he neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission;

All money, deadly weapons, books, records and research products and materials, including formulas, microfilm, tapes and data which are used, or intended for use, in violation of this chapter or Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Property subject to forfeiture may be seized by the alcoholic beverage control division and its agents, local law enforcement officers, Mississippi Highway Patrol officers and other law enforcement personnel charged by Section 67-1-91, with enforcing the provisions of this chapter upon process issued by any appropriate court having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure without process may be made if:

The Seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant or an administrative inspection under Section 67-1-37(k);

The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon this chapter or Chapter 31 of Article 97, Mississippi Code of 1972; or

The alcoholic beverage control division of the state tax commission and other law enforcement personnel described in this subsection have probable cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of this chapter or Chapter 31 of Article 97, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Alcoholic beverages and raw materials seized or detained under the authority of this chapter or Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972, is deemed to be in the custody of the agent or agency so seizing the property and subject only to the orders and decrees of the court having jurisdiction over the property. When such property is seized it may be retained as evidence until final disposition of the cause in which such property is involved, and then the agent or agency so seizing the property shall physically transfer such alcoholic beverage or raw material to the director of the alcoholic beverage control division of the state tax commission together with an appropriate inventory of the items seized. Alcoholic beverages and raw materials seized or detained under the authority of this section shall be disposed of in accordance with the provisions of Section 67-1-18.

Any property other than alcoholic beverages and raw materials seized or detained pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be deemed to be in the custody of the agent or agency so seizing the property and subject only to the orders and decrees of the court having jurisdiction over the property. When such property is seized it may be retained as evidence until the final disposition of the cause in which such property is involved. Property seized or detained other than alcoholic beverages or raw materials shall be disposed of in accordance with the provisions of Sections 67-1-93, 67-1-95 and 67-1-97.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-07; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 7; Laws, 1971, ch. 347, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 424, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1984).

§ 67-1-18.
Disposal of seized property by Department of Revenue.

Any alcoholic beverage, light wine, beer or raw material seized under the authority of this chapter, Chapter 3 of Title 67, or Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be submitted to the custody of the Mississippi Department of Revenue for disposition.

Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the department shall not dispose of any alcoholic beverage, light wine, beer or raw material without first providing reasonable notice to all individuals having an interest in the property and an opportunity for them to appear and establish their right or claim to the property. If no hearing is requested by the passage of the appropriate deadline, the department shall require the alcoholic beverages, light wine, beer or raw materials to be sold for the benefit of the state or destroyed.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply in cases in which the owner or possessor of the alcoholic beverage, light wine, beer or raw material is convicted of possession of alcoholic beverages, beer or light wine in a location in which such possession is prohibited by law, or convicted of a violation of Section 67-1-81(2) or 67-3-70. In such cases, the alcoholic beverage, light wine, beer or raw materials seized in connection with the violation may be disposed of in the manner prescribed by the department.

If the department orders the property, other than alcoholic beverages, sold, then the property shall be sold to the highest bidder, the bidder being any person, firm or government agency. The offer for sale shall be made to not less than three (3) qualified prospective buyers, by mailing them an invitation to bid, which shall describe the property, terms of sale, method of delivery, manner of bidding and fixing a time of not more than fifteen (15) days from the date of invitation for opening of bids received by the department.

All bids and payment shall be made in the manner as prescribed by the department. Bids, after opening, shall be subject to public inspection.

If the department orders the sale of seized alcoholic beverages, it may place the alcoholic beverages in the state inventory to be sold to authorized retailers in the same manner as other alcoholic beverages in the state inventory are sold.

Any appeal from a seizure and disposal made under this section shall be made pursuant to Section 67-1-72.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 424, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 438, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 470, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 67-1-19.
Administration of chapter.

The administration and enforcement of this chapter shall be vested in the Department of Revenue. There is hereby created the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division within and as a part of the Department of Revenue.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-08; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 8; Laws, 1980, ch. 561, § 13; Laws, 2009, ch. 492, § 127, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 67-1-21.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2009, ch. 492, § 143, effective from and after July 1, 2010.

§67-1-21. [Codes 1942, § 10265-09; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1966.]

§ 67-1-23.
Appointment of division personnel; oath.

The Commissioner of Revenue of the Department of Revenue shall appoint a director of the division, and may appoint or employ such agents, inspectors, clerks and other employees for such division as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter or to perform the duties and exercise the powers conferred by this chapter upon the department. The Commissioner of Revenue shall have the authority to employ, compensate, terminate, suspend with or without pay, promote, demote, transfer or reprimand the director, agents, inspectors, clerks and other employees of the division. The director and all permanent employees of the division shall devote their full time to the duties of their respective offices.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-10; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 10; Laws, 1980, ch. 561, § 14; Laws, 2009, ch. 492, § 128, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 67-1-25.
Qualifications of personnel.

No person shall be appointed director, agent or inspector for the commission under this chapter who is not a citizen of the United States. No director, agent, inspector or other employee shall be appointed under this chapter who has been convicted of any violation of any federal or state law concerning the manufacture, sale or possession of alcoholic liquor prior or subsequent to July 1, 1966, or who has paid a fine or penalty in settlement of any prosecution against him for any violation of such laws or shall have forfeited his bond to appear in court to answer charges for any such violation, nor shall any person be so appointed who has been convicted of a felony in any state or federal court. No person appointed or employed by the commission under this chapter may, directly or indirectly, individually or as a member of a partnership or limited liability company, or as a shareholder of a corporation, have any interest whatsoever in the manufacture, sale or distribution of alcoholic liquor, or receive any compensation or profit therefrom, or have any interest whatsoever in the purchases or sales made by the persons authorized by this chapter to purchase or to sell alcoholic liquor.

This section shall not prevent any person appointed or employed by the commission from purchasing and keeping in his possession for the use of himself or members of his family or guests any alcoholic liquor which may be purchased or kept by any other person by virtue of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-12; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 12; Laws, 2006, ch. 529, § 8; Laws, 2007, ch. 462, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 26, 2007.).

§ 67-1-27.
Bonds of personnel.

Before entering into the duties of his office, the director, and such other agents, inspectors and employees appointed under the provisions of this chapter as the commission shall designate, shall give surety bond, with some company authorized to do business in the State of Mississippi and approved by the State Insurance Commissioner, appearing thereon as surety, in a sum of not less than five thousand dollars, conditioned upon the faithful performance of their duties. The premiums for such bonds shall be paid out of funds appropriated for the support of the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-14; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1966.

§ 67-1-29.
Compensation of personnel.

The director, secretary, agents, inspectors, clerks and employees of the commission appointed under this chapter shall receive such reasonable compensation as may be fixed by the commission. The director and all agents, inspectors, clerks, and other employees shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary traveling and other expenses and disbursements incurred or made by them in the discharge of their official duties. Such compensation and expenses shall be paid from funds appropriated for the support of the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-15; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1966.

§ 67-1-31.
Law enforcement authority of agents and inspectors; liability of members of commission for acts or omissions of agents or inspectors.

The commission shall issue to all agents and inspectors appointed under this chapter a written certificate of appointment under the seal of said commission, of which judicial notice shall be taken by all courts of this state. Such agents and inspectors are hereby declared to be police officers in enforcing the provisions of this chapter, and in the performance of their duties such employees shall have the authority to bear arms, to make arrests, to make searches and seizures under this chapter, and to serve any protest, notice or order connected with the enforcement of this chapter by whatever officer or authority of court issued. The members of the commission shall not be personally liable to any person on account of any act, neglect or omission of any such agent or inspector.

The powers and duties of the agents and inspectors shall include, in addition to all others prescribed by law the following powers: to arrest, without warrant, any person committing or attempting to commit a misdemeanor, felony or a breach of the peace within his presence or view, and to pursue and so arrest any person committing such an offense to and at any place in the state where the person may go or be; and to aid and assist any law enforcement officer, if requested. Nothing herein shall be construed as granting agents and inspectors of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the State Tax Commission general police powers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-11; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 11; Laws, 1982, ch. 384; Laws, 1995, ch. 350, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1995).

§ 67-1-33.
Gratuities and gifts to members of the Board of Tax Appeals, Commissioner of Revenue of Department of Revenue or Department of Revenue and employees prohibited.

No member of the Board of Tax Appeals, Commissioner of Revenue of the Department of Revenue, or person appointed or employed by the department under this chapter shall solicit, accept or receive any gift, gratuity, emolument or employment from any person subject to the provisions of this chapter, or from any officer, agent or employee thereof.

No member of the Board of Tax Appeals, the Commissioner of Revenue of the Department of Revenue, or person appointed or employed by the department under this chapter shall solicit, request from or recommend, directly or indirectly, to any person subject to the provisions of this chapter, or to any officer, agent or employee thereof, the appointment of any person to any place or position.

Every person subject to the provisions of this chapter, and every officer, agent or employee thereof, is hereby forbidden to offer to any member of the Board of Tax Appeals, to the Commissioner of Revenue or to any person appointed or employed by the department under this chapter any gift, gratuity, emolument or employment.

If any member of the Board of Tax Appeals, the Commissioner of Revenue or any person appointed or employed by the department under this chapter shall violate any of the provisions of this section, he shall be removed from the office or employment held by him.

Every person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

For purposes of this provision, the terms “gift,” “gratuity,” “emolument” and “employment” do not include the payment of expenses associated with social occasions afforded public servants or any other benefit that does not come within the definition of “pecuniary benefit” as defined in Section 25-4-103.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-13; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 13; Laws, 2009, ch. 492, § 129, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 67-1-35.
Official seal of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Revenue.

The department may, for authentication of records, process and proceedings, adopt, keep and use a seal for the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Revenue, of which seal judicial notice shall be taken in all courts of this state. Any process, notice or other paper which the department may be authorized by law to issue under this chapter shall be deemed sufficient if signed by the director and authenticated by such seal. All acts, orders, proceedings, rules, regulations, entries, minutes, and other records of the department in connection with this chapter, and all reports and documents filed with it under this chapter, may be proved in any court of this state by a copy thereof certified to by the director with the seal of the division affixed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-16; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 16; Laws, 2009, ch. 492, § 130, eff from and after July 1, 2010.